Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.300

School physician or school nurse may be employed.

The board of directors of any school district of the second class may employ a regularly licensed physician or a licensed public health nurse for the purpose of protecting the health of the children in said district.

[ 1975 c 43 s 20; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.60.320. Prior: 1937 c 60 s 1; RRS s 4776-4. Formerly RCW 28A.60.320, 28.31.080.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975 c 43: See notes following RCW 28A.535.050.